Nevada, session 83, SB488.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State the sum of $460,423 for
the replacement of computers and information technology
equipment.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State the sum of $1,462,864
for the costs of voter education materials and outreach, ballot
translation and interpretive services and travel.
Sec. 3. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State the sum of $26,000 for
the HAVA Election Reform budget account for costs associated
with voter identity verification.
Sec. 4. Any remaining balance of an appropriation made by
sections 1, 2 and 3 of this act must not be committed for expenditure
after June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made
or any entity to which money from the appropriation is granted or
otherwise transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any purpose
after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money
was appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)